modules/nlb/braille/src/main/resources/hyph/hyph_nb_NO.dic
top9prioritetens/pp=p,3,2
top9pris/pp=p,3,2
top9prisen/pp=p,3,2
top9prisene/pp=p,3,2
top9prisens/pp=p,3,2
top9priser/pp=p,3,2
top9produkt/pp=p,3,2
top9produktene/pp=p,3,2
top9produkter/pp=p,3,2
top9produktet/pp=p,3,2
top9produktets/pp=p,3,2
top9produsent/pp=p,3,2
top9produsenten/pp=p,3,2
top9produsentene/pp=p,3,2
top9produsentens/pp=p,3,2
top9produsenter/pp=p,3,2
top9profesjonell/pp=p,3,2
top9profesjonelle/pp=p,3,2
top9punkt/pp=p,3,2
top9punktene/pp=p,3,2
top9punkter/pp=p,3,2
top9punktet/pp=p,3,2
top9punktets/pp=p,3,2
toppfotbal9leder/ll=l,10,2
toppfotbal9ledere/ll=l,10,2
toppfotbal9lederen/ll=l,10,2
toppfotbal9lederens/ll=l,10,2
toppfotbal9lederes/ll=l,10,2
toppfotbal9lederne/ll=l,10,2
toppfotbal9ledernes/ll=l,10,2
trafik9kamera/kk=k,6,2
trafik9kameraene/kk=k,6,2
trafik9kameraer/kk=k,6,2
trafik9kameraet/kk=k,6,2
trafik9kameraets/kk=k,6,2
trafik9kampanje/kk=k,6,2
trafik9kampanjen/kk=k,6,2
trafik9kampanjene/kk=k,6,2
trafik9kampanjens/kk=k,6,2
trafik9kampanjer/kk=k,6,2
trafik9kaos/kk=k,6,2
trafik9kaoset/kk=k,6,2
trafik9kaosets/kk=k,6,2
trafik9kapasitet/kk=k,6,2
trafik9kapasiteten/kk=k,6,2
trafik9kapasitetens/kk=k,6,2
trafik9karusell/kk=k,6,2
trafik9karusellen/kk=k,6,2
trafik9karusellens/kk=k,6,2
trafik9knute/kk=k,6,2
trafik9knuten/kk=k,6,2
trafik9knutene/kk=k,6,2
trafik9knutens/kk=k,6,2
trafik9knutepunkt/kk=k,6,2
trafik9knutepunkta/kk=k,6,2
trafik9knutepunktene/kk=k,6,2
trafik9knutepunkter/kk=k,6,2
trafik9knutepunktet/kk=k,6,2
trafik9knutepunktets/kk=k,6,2
trafik9knuter/kk=k,6,2
trafik9knuteyyyy/kk=k,6,2
trafik9kollaps/kk=k,6,2
trafik9kollapsen/kk=k,6,2
trafik9kollapsens/kk=k,6,2
trafik9konstabel/kk=k,6,2
trafik9konstabelen/kk=k,6,2
trafik9konstabelens/kk=k,6,2
trafik9konstablene/kk=k,6,2
trafik9konstabler/kk=k,6,2
trafik9konsulent/kk=k,6,2
trafik9konsulenten/kk=k,6,2
trafik9konsulentens/kk=k,6,2
trafik9kontor/kk=k,6,2
trafik9kontoret/kk=k,6,2
trafik9kontorets/kk=k,6,2
trafik9kontroll/kk=k,6,2
trafik9kontrollane/kk=k,6,2
trafik9kontrollar/kk=k,6,2
trafik9kontrollen/kk=k,6,2
trafik9kontrollene/kk=k,6,2
trafik9kontrollens/kk=k,6,2
trafik9kontroller/kk=k,6,2
trafik9kontrollsystem/kk=k,6,2
trafik9kontrollsystemene/kk=k,6,2
trafik9kontrollsystemer/kk=k,6,2
trafik9kontrollsystemet/kk=k,6,2
trafik9kontrollsystemets/kk=k,6,2
trafik9kontrollyyyy/kk=k,6,2
trafik9kontrollør/kk=k,6,2
trafik9kontrolløren/kk=k,6,2
trafik9kontrollørene/kk=k,6,2
trafik9kontrollørens/kk=k,6,2
trafik9kontrollører/kk=k,6,2
trafik9kork/kk=k,6,2
trafik9korkane/kk=k,6,2
trafik9korkar/kk=k,6,2
trafik9korken/kk=k,6,2
trafik9korkene/kk=k,6,2
trafik9korkens/kk=k,6,2
trafik9korker/kk=k,6,2
trafik9korps/kk=k,6,2
trafik9korpset/kk=k,6,2
trafik9korpsets/kk=k,6,2
trafik9korridor/kk=k,6,2
trafik9korridoren/kk=k,6,2
trafik9korridorene/kk=k,6,2
trafik9korridorens/kk=k,6,2
trafik9korridorer/kk=k,6,2
trafik9kryss/kk=k,6,2
trafik9kryssene/kk=k,6,2
trafik9krysset/kk=k,6,2
trafik9kryssets/kk=k,6,2
trafik9kultur/kk=k,6,2
trafik9kulturen/kk=k,6,2
trafik9kulturens/kk=k,6,2
trafik9kunnskap/kk=k,6,2
trafik9kunnskapen/kk=k,6,2
trafik9kunnskapene/kk=k,6,2
trafik9kunnskapens/kk=k,6,2
trafik9kunnskaper/kk=k,6,2
trafik9kurs/kk=k,6,2
trafik9kursa/kk=k,6,2
trafik9kurset/kk=k,6,2
trafik9kursets/kk=k,6,2
trafik9kø/kk=k,6,2
trafik9køane/kk=k,6,2
trafik9køar/kk=k,6,2
trafik9køen/kk=k,6,2
trafik9køene/kk=k,6,2
trafik9køens/kk=k,6,2
trafik9køer/kk=k,6,2
transit9terminal/tt=t,7,2
transit9terminalen/tt=t,7,2
transit9terminalens/tt=t,7,2
transit9tid/tt=t,7,2
transit9tiden/tt=t,7,2
transit9tidens/tt=t,7,2
transit9trafikk/tt=t,7,2
transit9trafikken/tt=t,7,2
transit9trafikkens/tt=t,7,2
trek9kraft/kk=k,4,2
trek9kraften/kk=k,4,2
trek9kraftens/kk=k,4,2
trek9kreftene/kk=k,4,2
trek9kreftenes/kk=k,4,2
trek9krefter/kk=k,4,2
tryk9kabin/kk=k,4,2
tryk9kabinen/kk=k,4,2
tryk9kabinene/kk=k,4,2
tryk9kabinens/kk=k,4,2
tryk9kabiner/kk=k,4,2
tryk9kammer/kk=k,4,2
tryk9kammeret/kk=k,4,2
tryk9kammerets/kk=k,4,2
tryk9kammertilknytning/kk=k,4,2
tryk9kammertilknytningen/kk=k,4,2
tryk9kammertilknytningens/kk=k,4,2
tryk9kamre/kk=k,4,2
tryk9kamrene/kk=k,4,2
tryk9knapp/kk=k,4,2
tryk9knappen/kk=k,4,2
tryk9knappene/kk=k,4,2
tryk9knappens/kk=k,4,2
tryk9knapper/kk=k,4,2
tryk9koker/kk=k,4,2
tryk9kokere/kk=k,4,2
tryk9kokeren/kk=k,4,2
tryk9kokerens/kk=k,4,2
tryk9kokeres/kk=k,4,2
tryk9kokerne/kk=k,4,2
tryk9kokernes/kk=k,4,2
tryk9koking/kk=k,4,2
tryk9kokingen/kk=k,4,2
tryk9kokingens/kk=k,4,2
tryk9kraft/kk=k,4,2
tryk9kraften/kk=k,4,2
tryk9kraftens/kk=k,4,2
tryk9kvalitet/kk=k,4,2
tryk9kvaliteten/kk=k,4,2
tryk9kvalitetene/kk=k,4,2
tryk9kvalitetens/kk=k,4,2
tryk9kvaliteter/kk=k,4,2
tver9religiøs/rr=r,4,2
tver9religiøse/rr=r,4,2
tver9religiøst/rr=r,4,2
tåregas9spray/ss=s,7,2
tåregas9sprayen/ss=s,7,2
tåregas9sprayens/ss=s,7,2
tåspis9sko/ss=s,6,2
tåspis9skoen/ss=s,6,2
tåspis9skoene/ss=s,6,2
tåspis9skoens/ss=s,6,2
tåspis9stilling/ss=s,6,2
tåspis9stillingen/ss=s,6,2
tåspis9stillingens/ss=s,6,2
tør9råt/rr=r,3,2
tør9råte/rr=r,3,2
tør9råten/rr=r,3,2
tør9råtens/rr=r,3,2
ugres9salt/ss=s,5,2
ugres9saltene/ss=s,5,2
ugres9salter/ss=s,5,2
ugres9saltet/ss=s,5,2
ugres9saltets/ss=s,5,2
ul9lua/ll=l,2,2
ul9lue/ll=l,2,2
ul9luen/ll=l,2,2
ul9luens/ll=l,2,2
valnøt9tre/tt=t,6,2
valnøt9treet/tt=t,6,2
valnøt9treets/tt=t,6,2
valnøt9trær/tt=t,6,2
valnøt9trærne/tt=t,6,2
van9nivå/nn=n,3,2
van9nivået/nn=n,3,2
van9nivåets/nn=n,3,2
van9nymfe/nn=n,3,2
van9nymfen/nn=n,3,2
van9nymfene/nn=n,3,2
van9nymfens/nn=n,3,2
van9nymfer/nn=n,3,2
vas9sele/ss=s,3,2
vas9selen/ss=s,3,2
vas9selens/ss=s,3,2
vas9skilja/ss=s,3,2
vas9skilje/ss=s,3,2
vas9skiljet/ss=s,3,2
vas9skille/ss=s,3,2
vas9skillet/ss=s,3,2
vas9skillets/ss=s,3,2
vas9skorpa/ss=s,3,2
vas9skorpe/ss=s,3,2
vas9slange/ss=s,3,2
vas9slangen/ss=s,3,2
vas9slangene/ss=s,3,2
vas9slangens/ss=s,3,2
vas9slanger/ss=s,3,2
vas9stand/ss=s,3,2
vas9standane/ss=s,3,2
vas9standar/ss=s,3,2
vas9standen/ss=s,3,2
vas9strålane/ss=s,3,2
vas9strålar/ss=s,3,2
vas9stråle/ss=s,3,2
vas9strålen/ss=s,3,2
vas9strålene/ss=s,3,2
vas9strålens/ss=s,3,2
vas9stråler/ss=s,3,2
vat9teppe/tt=t,3,2
vat9teppet/tt=t,3,2
vat9teppets/tt=t,3,2
vil9laks/ll=l,3,2
vil9laksen/ll=l,3,2
vil9laksens/ll=l,3,2
vil9leda/ll=l,3,2
vil9lede/ll=l,3,2
vil9ledelse/ll=l,3,2
vil9ledelsen/ll=l,3,2
vil9ledelsens/ll=l,3,2
vil9ledende/ll=l,3,2
vil9leder/ll=l,3,2
vil9ledes/ll=l,3,2
vil9ledet/ll=l,3,2
vil9ledning/ll=l,3,2
vil9ledningen/ll=l,3,2
vil9ledningens/ll=l,3,2
vil9leiande/ll=l,3,2
vil9leidd/ll=l,3,2
vil9leidde/ll=l,3,2
vil9leie/ll=l,3,2
vil9leier/ll=l,3,2
vil9leiing/ll=l,3,2
vil9leiinga/ll=l,3,2
vil9leiingen/ll=l,3,2
vil9leiingens/ll=l,3,2
visit9tid/tt=t,5,2
visit9tiden/tt=t,5,2
visit9tidene/tt=t,5,2
visit9tidens/tt=t,5,2
visit9tider/tt=t,5,2
volleybal9lag/ll=l,9,2
volleybal9lagene/ll=l,9,2
volleybal9laget/ll=l,9,2
volleybal9lagets/ll=l,9,2
volleybal9lags/ll=l,9,2
volleybal9landskamp/ll=l,9,2
volleybal9landskampen/ll=l,9,2
volleybal9landskampene/ll=l,9,2
volleybal9landskampens/ll=l,9,2
volleybal9landskamper/ll=l,9,2
volleybal9landslag/ll=l,9,2
volleybal9landslaget/ll=l,9,2
volleybal9landslagets/ll=l,9,2
volleybal9leder/ll=l,9,2
volleybal9ledere/ll=l,9,2
volleybal9lederen/ll=l,9,2
volleybal9lederens/ll=l,9,2
volleybal9lederes/ll=l,9,2
volleybal9lederne/ll=l,9,2
volleybal9ledernes/ll=l,9,2
øredob9behengt/bb=b,6,2
øredob9behengte/bb=b,6,2
øvrevol9løp/ll=l,7,2
øvrevol9løpa/ll=l,7,2
øvrevol9løpene/ll=l,7,2
øvrevol9løpet/ll=l,7,2
øvrevol9løpets/ll=l,7,2
